California, session 20252026, SB580.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12532.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:12532.5. (a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, the Attorney General shall publish model policies for state and local agencies relating to interaction with immigration authorities consistent with federal and state law.(2) On or before January 1, 2027, a state or local agency shall implement the model policy or an equivalent policy.(b) On or before July 1, 2026, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, the Attorney General shall publish guidance, audit criteria, and training recommendations for databases operated by a state or local agency, including databases maintained for the agency by private vendors, aimed at ensuring that the databases are governed in a manner that makes the availability of information therein to anyone or any entity for the purposes of immigration enforcement limited to the fullest extent practicable, consistent with federal and state law.(c) A rule, policy, or standard of general application issued by the Attorney General pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Immigrants are valuable and essential members of the California community and indiscriminate immigration enforcement against persons who do not pose a public safety risk to Californians has a significant negative impact on state and local functions. Increased immigration enforcement activity in California, including in the workplace and schools, has been detrimental to the health and welfare of California’s residents.(b) The California Constitution confers an inalienable right to privacy for all Californians. This right to privacy protects the personal, private information of individuals.(c) A relationship of trust between California’s immigrant community and state and local agencies is central to the functioning of the state’s government and the public safety, health, welfare, and constitutional rights of the people of California.(d) Protecting the state’s limited public resources from being used for federal immigration enforcement actions is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 12532.5 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.